California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) When a transferee or purchaser of a vehicle applies for transfer of registration, as provided in Section 5902 of the Vehicle Code, and it is determined by the department that vehicle license fee penalties accrued prior to the purchase of the vehicle and that the transferee or purchaser was not cognizant of the nonpayment of the vehicle license fee for the current or prior registration years, the department may waive the vehicle license fee penalties upon payment of the vehicle license fees due.

(b) Other provisions of this code notwithstanding, the Director of
 Motor Vehicles may, at his discretion, investigate into the circumstances of any application for registration to ascertain if penalties had accrued through no fault or intent of the owner. Provided such circumstances prevail, the director may waive any penalties upon payment of the license fee then due.

(c) When a transferee or purchaser of a vehicle applies for transfer of registration of a vehicle, and it is determined by the department that license fees for the vehicle for any year are unpaid and due, that the fees became due prior to the transfer or purchase of the vehicle by the transferee or purchaser, and that the transferee or purchaser was not cognizant of the fact that the fees were unpaid and due, the department may waive the fees and any penalty thereon when both of the following conditions exist:

(1) The license plate assigned to the vehicle displays a validating
 device issued by the department, and the validating device contains the year number of the registration year for which the transferee or purchaser is requesting a waiver of fees and penalties.

(2) The transferee or purchaser has submitted to the department the registration card that indicates the vehicle is registered for the registration year indicated on the validating device displayed on the license plate assigned to the vehicle.

(d) Upon the transfer of a vehicle for which license fees and any penalties thereon are unpaid and due, such fees and penalties are, notwithstanding the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 10876), the personal debt of the transferor of the vehicle who did not pay the fees and penalties when they became due or accrued. The fees and penalties may be collected by the department in an appropriate civil action if the department has waived the
 fees and penalties pursuant to subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 759, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Seizure and Sale [10876. - 10879.]

10876.

Every license fee and any penalty added thereto, from the date on which the fee becomes due, shall constitute a lien upon the vehicle for which due and upon any other vehicle owned by the owner of that vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 759, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10877.

The department shall collect the fee and any penalty by seizure and sale of the vehicle as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of Chapter 6 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, or by appropriate civil action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 759, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10878.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 10877 and 10951, the responsibility and authority for the collection of the following delinquent amounts, and any interest, penalties, or service fees added thereto, shall be transferred from the department to the Franchise Tax Board:

(1) Registration fees.

(2) Transfer fees.

(3) License fees.

(4) Use taxes.

(5) Penalties for offenses relating to the standing or parking of a vehicle for which a notice of parking violation has been served on the owner, and any administrative service
 fee added to the penalty.

(6) Unpaid tolls, toll evasion penalties as described in Section 40252 of the Vehicle Code, and any related administrative or service fees.

(7) Any court-imposed fine or penalty assessment, and any administrative service fee added thereto, that is subject to collection by the department.

(b) Any reference in this part to the department in connection with the duty to collect these amounts shall be deemed a reference to the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) (1) The amounts collected under subdivision (a) may be collected in any manner authorized under the law as though they were a tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) that is final, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy
 under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for an earnings withholding order for taxes. Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401), or 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), or any other applicable law shall apply for this purpose in the same manner and with the same force and effect as if the language of Part 10, 10.2, or 10.7, or the other applicable law is incorporated in full into this authority to collect these amounts, except to the extent that the provision is either inconsistent with the collection of these amounts or is not relevant to the collection of these amounts.

(2) Both of the following shall apply to any levy or order issued on or after January 1, 2022:

(A) The maximum amount of disposable earnings of a debtor for any
 workweek that is subject to collection shall not exceed the amount specified in Section 706.050 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(B) The minimum basic standard of care amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 704.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall not be subject to collection.

(d) Even though the amounts authorized by this section are collected as though they are taxes, amounts so received by the Franchise Tax Board shall be deposited into an appropriate fund or account upon agreement between the Franchise Tax Board and the department. The amounts shall be distributed by the department from the appropriate fund or account in accordance with the laws providing for the deposits and distributions as though the moneys were received by the department.

(e) For any collection action under this section, the
 Franchise Tax Board may utilize the contract authorization, procedures, and mechanisms available either with respect to the collection of taxes, interest, additions to tax, and penalties pursuant to Section 19376, or with respect to the collection of the delinquencies by the department immediately prior to the time this section takes effect.

(f) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criteria, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board in implementing and administering the program required by this section.

(g) Any standard, criteria, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or
 guideline, that is not subject to the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code pursuant to subdivision (f), shall be approved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself.

(h) The Franchise Tax Board may enter into any agreements or contracts necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this section. The Franchise Tax Board in administering this section may delegate collection activities to the department. Any contracts may provide for payment of the contract on the basis of a percentage of the amount of revenue realized as a result of the contractor’s services under that contract. However, the Franchise Tax Board, in administering this part, may not enter into contracts with private collection agencies as authorized under Section 19377.

(i) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this
 subdivision shall apply commencing with the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 12.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10879.

In the case of leased vehicles, for purposes of Section 10877, this section, and Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of Chapter 6 of Division 3 of the Vehicle Code, the following shall apply:

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in the event the lessor designates the address of the lessee under subdivision (a) of Section 4453.5 of the Vehicle Code and provides the Department of Motor Vehicles with the address of the lessor, at a time and in the form and manner
 required by the department, the lessee shall be solely liable for the following, and any interest, penalties, or service fees added thereto:

(A) Penalties resulting from the delinquent registration of the leased vehicle.

(B) Penalties for offenses relating to the standing or parking of a vehicle for which a notice of parking violation has been served on the owner.

(C) Any court-imposed fines or penalty assessments that are subject to collection by the department.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the lien described in Section 9800 of the Vehicle Code shall remain in full force and effect for all unpaid penalties, fines, and fees described in this subdivision, including related interest, if any.

(3) Upon a bona fide sale or transfer of the vehicle, the lien on the vehicle being sold or transferred shall be released if the lessor has paid the registration and license fees within 30 days after the lessor is issued notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board in accordance with subdivision (b).

(4) Any amount that is owed by the lessee under paragraph (1) at the time the lien is released in accordance with paragraph (3) shall constitute a lessee liability enforceable under Section 9805 of the Vehicle Code and collectible in accordance with Section 10878 of this code.

(b) If, within 30 days after notice and demand is issued to the lessor by the Franchise Tax Board, the lessor fails to pay the registration and license fees required to register the vehicle, all of the following shall apply to the lessor:

(1) The lessor shall remain solely liable for those registration and license fees.

(2) The lessor shall be jointly and severally liable with the lessee for the amounts described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(3) The lessor shall not be subject to relief under Section 4760 or 9561 of the Vehicle Code or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1211, Sec. 2.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Refunds [10901. - 10902.]

10901.

Whenever the department or the Department of Housing and Community Development erroneously collects any license fee or portion of a fee not required to be paid under this part, or erroneously applies any offset provided under this part, the erroneously collected amount shall be refunded to the person paying it upon application therefor made within three years after the date of the payment. If the department or the Department of Housing and Community Development discovers an error, it may make a refund in the absence of an application
 therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 4.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

10902.

(a) In the event of a constructive total loss, in which the repair value exceeds the market value of the vehicle less the anticipated salvage value, or a nonrepairable vehicle, or an unrecovered total loss, due to a theft, of a vehicle, the in-lieu fee portion of the vehicle license fee that has been paid, less any offset provided in Section 10754, shall be refunded to the current registered owner (the owner of the salvage value of the vehicle), or credited against the vehicle license fee owed on the owner’s replacement vehicle. The
 amount refunded or credited shall be based upon one-twelfth of the annual in-lieu fee, less any offset provided by Section 10754, for each full month that remains until the registration expires.

(b) No refund or credit may be made pursuant to this section unless the vehicle owner has signed a declaration under penalty of perjury that he or she has not been cited or convicted of violating Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code (relating to driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs) or Section 23103 as specified in Section 23103.5 of that code (which involves a substitute for an original citation of driving under the influence) in connection with the owner’s vehicle loss. If the owner has been cited under any of these code sections, the owner shall be entitled to the refund or credit upon presentation of either proof of dismissal of the citation or a finding of not guilty.

(c) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall charge to vehicle owners requesting a refund or credit pursuant to this section a service fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to cover the administrative costs of processing the request.

(d) In the case of a request for refund or credit with respect to a stolen vehicle, the vehicle owner may not be entitled to a refund or credit prior to 60 days from the date the theft of the vehicle is reported to the police. If a refund is received or a credit is applied to another vehicle and the stolen vehicle is subsequently recovered, the owner shall return the amount refunded or credited. If the owner receives a refund or credit, and the destroyed or stolen vehicle is scrapped and subsequently repaired by another person, the new owner shall pay the full vehicle license fee.

(e) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall adopt
 regulations for the administration of the refunds and credits provided by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 719, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Administration [10951. - 10952.]

10951.

The department shall enforce the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

10952.

The director of the department may employ and fix the salaries of employees necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Distribution of Proceeds [11001. - 11006.]

11001.

(a) All money collected by the department for accepted applications under this part shall be reported monthly to the Controller and, at the same time, deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

Any reference in any law or regulation to the Motor Vehicle License Fee Fund shall be deemed to refer to the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund.

(b) The amount of any penalties collected by the department, as provided in Sections
 9553 and 9554 of the Vehicle Code and Sections 10770 and 10854 of this code, shall, for purposes of subdivision (a), be deemed to be a percentage of the total fees allocated under this section and under Section 42270 of the Vehicle Code equal to that percentage of the weight fee, registration fee, and vehicle license fee obtained when applying the total of these fees collected, excluding use tax, against the individual weight fees, registration fees, and vehicle license fees collected on each application. Penalties which cannot be allocated in accordance with this subdivision shall be allocated according to subdivision (c).

(c) The amount of any penalties collected by the department, as provided in Sections 9553 and 9554 of the Vehicle Code and Sections 10770 and 10854 of this code which cannot be allocated pursuant to subdivision (b), shall, for purposes of subdivision (a), be deemed to be a percentage of the total fees allocated under this
 section and under Section 42270 of the Vehicle Code equal to that percentage of the ratio based on the fees previously allocated under this section and under Section 42270 of the Vehicle Code in the fiscal year preceding the calendar year for which the penalties are to be allocated. That ratio shall be reevaluated periodically and shall be adjusted to reflect any change in the fee structure that may be provided in this code or in Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 123, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

11001.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 11001, and except as provided in
 paragraph (2) and in subdivisions (b) and (d), 24.33 percent, and on and after July 1, 2004, 74.9 percent, of the moneys collected by the department under this part shall be reported monthly to the Controller, and at the same time, deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. All other moneys collected by the department under this part shall continue to be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund and in accordance with the following:

(A) Before July 1, 2011, first allocated to the County of Orange as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 11005 and as necessary for the service of indebtedness as pledged by Sections 25350.6 and 53585.1 of the Government Code and in accordance with written instructions provided by the Controller under Sections 25350.7, 25350.9, and 53585.1 of the
 Government Code, and the balance shall be allocated to each city and city and county as otherwise provided by law.

(B) On and after July 1, 2011, allocated pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11005.

(2) For the period beginning on and after July 1, 2003, and ending on February 29, 2004, the Controller shall deposit an amount equal to 28.07 percent of the moneys collected by the department under this part in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund. All other moneys collected by the department under this part shall continue to be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund and allocated to each city, county, and city and county as otherwise provided by law.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 11001, net funds collected as a
 result of procedures developed for greater compliance with vehicle license fee laws in order to increase the amount of vehicle license fee collections shall be reported monthly to the Controller, and at the same time, deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Vehicle License Collection Account of the Local Revenue Fund as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. All revenues in excess of fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) in the 2004–05 fiscal year and in any fiscal year thereafter shall be allocated to cities, counties, and cities and counties as follows:

(A) (i) Fifty percent shall be paid to the cities and cities and counties of this state in the proportion that the population of each city or city and county bears to the total population of all cities and cities and counties in this state, as determined by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance. For
 purposes of this subparagraph, the population of each city or city and county is that population determined by the last federal decennial or special census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit or subsequent estimate prepared pursuant to Section 2107.2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(ii) In the case of a city incorporated subsequent to the last federal census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit, the Demographic Research Unit shall determine the population of the city. In the case of unincorporated territory annexed to a city subsequent to the last federal census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit, the Demographic Research Unit shall determine the population of the annexed territory by the use of any federal decennial or special census, or estimate prepared pursuant to Section 2107.2 of the Streets and Highways Code. In the case of the consolidation of
 one city with another subsequent to the last federal census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit, the population of the consolidated city, for the purpose of this subparagraph, is the aggregate population of the respective cities as determined by the last federal census, or a subsequent census or estimate validated by the Demographic Research Unit.

(B) Fifty percent shall be paid to the counties and cities and counties in the proportion that the population of each county or city and county bears to the total population of all counties and cities and counties, as determined by the Demographic Research Unit. For purposes of this subparagraph, the population of each county or city and county is that determined by the last federal census, or subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit, or as determined by Section 11005.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this paragraph are operative upon the enactment of that act. However, the amendments made by the act that added this paragraph apply to revenues in the Vehicle License Collection Account in excess of fourteen million dollars ($14,000,000) in the 2004–05 fiscal year and any fiscal year thereafter.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 11001, 25.72 percent of the moneys collected by the department on or after August 1, 1991, and before August 1, 1992, under this part shall be reported monthly to the Controller, and at the same time, deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund, as established pursuant to Section 17600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. All other moneys collected by the department under this part shall continue to be deposited to the credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the
 Transportation Tax Fund and allocated to each city, county, and city and county as otherwise provided by law.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, both of the following apply:

(1) This section is operative for the period beginning on and after March 1, 2004.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the total amount deposited by the Controller in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund for the 2003–04 fiscal year be equal to the total amount that would have been deposited to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund if paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) was applied during that entire fiscal year. The department shall calculate and notify the Controller of the adjustment amounts that are required by this paragraph to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund.
 The amounts deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Local Revenue Fund pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed to have been deposited during the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(e) This section does not amend nor is it intended to amend or impair Section 25350 and following of, Section 53584 and following of, the Government Code, or any other statute dealing with the interception of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 136.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11002.

The money in the Motor Vehicle License Fee Fund is hereby appropriated as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the Legislature shall annually determine and appropriate an amount for the use of the Department of Motor Vehicles and the Franchise Tax Board for the enforcement of this part.

(b) For the 2011–12 fiscal year, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be deemed to be the cost to the Department of Motor
 Vehicles of collecting the motor vehicle license fees that are collected with the motor vehicle registration fees and other fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 35, Sec. 8.   (SB 89)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11003.1.

All license fees on trailer coaches levied and collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to Section 10751 shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 699, Sec. 16.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.

On or before the first day of December of each fiscal year, on order of the Controller, there shall be transferred from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Fund to the General Fund and set apart sufficient money in the amount of the semiannual interest necessary to be paid during the following month of January on bonds of the State issued under:

(a) The “State Highways Act,” approved by the Governor March 22, 1909, and by a majority of the electors at the general election held November 8, 1910.

(b) The “State Highways Act of 1915,” approved by the
 Governor May 20, 1915, and by a majority of the electors at the general election held November 7, 1916.

(c) Section 2 of Article XVI of the Constitution as approved by a majority of the electors at a special election held July 1, 1919.

(d) Section 3 of Article XVI of the Constitution, as approved by a majority of the electors at the general election held November 2, 1920.

On or before the first day of June of each fiscal year, on order of the Controller, there shall be transferred from the Motor Vehicle License Fee Fund to the General Fund and set apart sufficient money in the amount of the semiannual interest and the annual redemption charges necessary to be paid during the following month of July on the bonds referred to in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

11004.5.

The Controller shall deduct from the allocations he would otherwise make pursuant to Section 11005, the amounts chargeable to each city, county, and city and county under Section 40516 of the Vehicle Code, and transfer that amount to the Motor Vehicle Fund in augmentation of the funds available for the support of the Department of California Highway Patrol.

The Controller shall make such deductions at the time of the first allocation which occurs after the filing with him of the charges certified by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol. If the amount of the deduction for any city, county, or city and county exceeds
 the amount of the allocation for such city, county, or city and county, the balance of the deduction in excess of the amount of the apportionment shall be carried over and applied to the next succeeding allocation or allocations until exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.

After payment of refunds therefrom and after making the deductions authorized by Section 11003 and reserving the amount determined necessary by the Pooled Money Investment Board to meet the transfers ordered or proposed to be ordered pursuant to Section 16310 of the Government Code, the balance of all motor vehicle license fees and any other money appropriated by law for expenditure pursuant to this section, deposited to the
 credit of the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund, and remaining unexpended in that account at the close of business on the last day of the calendar month, shall be allocated by the Controller by the 10th day of the following month in accordance with the following:

(a) On and after July 1, 2011, to the Local Law Enforcement Services Account in the Local Revenue Fund 2011, as established by Section 30025 of the Government Code, for allocation to cities, counties, and cities and counties.

(b) On or after July 1, 2004, but before July 1, 2011:

(1) First, to the County of Orange. For the 2004–05 fiscal year, that county shall be allocated fifty-four million dollars ($54,000,000) in monthly installments. For the 2005–06 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, that county shall receive, in
 monthly installments, an amount equal to the amount allocated under this section for the prior fiscal year, adjusted for the percentage change in the amount of revenues credited to the Motor Vehicle License Fee Account in the Transportation Tax Fund from the revenues credited to that account in the prior fiscal year. Moneys allocated to the County of Orange under this subdivision shall be used first for the service of indebtedness as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11001.5. Any amounts in excess of the amount required for this service of indebtedness may be used by that county for any lawful purpose.

(2) Second, to each city, the population of which is determined under Section 11005.3 on August 5, 2004, in an amount equal to the additional amount of vehicle license fee revenue, including offset transfers, that would be allocated to that city under Sections 11000 and 11005, as those sections read on January 1, 2004, as a
 result of that city’s population being determined under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 11005.3.

(3) Third, to each city that was incorporated from an unincorporated territory after August 5, 2004, in an amount equal to the product of the following two amounts:

(A) The quotient derived from the following fraction:

(i) The numerator is the product of the following two amounts:

(I) Fifty dollars ($50) per year.

(II) The fraction determined as the total amount of vehicle license fee revenue collected during the most recent fiscal year divided by the total amount of vehicle license fee revenue collected during the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(ii) The denominator is the fraction determined as the actual population, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11005.3, of all cities during the most recent fiscal year, divided by the actual population, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11005.3, of all cities in the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(B) The city’s population determined in accordance with Section 11005.3.

(4) Fourth, to each city that was incorporated before August 5, 2004, in an amount equal to the product of the following two amounts:

(A) The quotient derived from the following fraction:

(i) The numerator is the product of the following two amounts:

(I) Fifty dollars ($50) per year.

(II) The fraction determined as the total amount of vehicle license fee revenue collected during the most recent fiscal year divided by the total amount of vehicle license fee revenue collected during the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(ii) The denominator is the fraction determined as the actual population, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11005.3, of all cities during the most recent fiscal year, divided by the actual population, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11005.3, of all cities in the 2004–05 fiscal year.

(B) The actual population, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11005.3, residing in areas annexed after August 5, 2004, as of the date of annexation.

(5) Fifth, to the cities and cities and counties of this state in the proportion that
 the population of each city or city and county bears to the total population of all cities and cities and counties in this state, as determined by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance. For the purpose of this subdivision, the population of each city or city and county shall be determined in accordance with Section 11005.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 22.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.1.

(a) Any city or city and county may expend any money received by it pursuant to Section 11005 for:

(1) Planning, acquiring, constructing, operating, or maintaining a rapid transit system itself or jointly with one or more other cities, counties, cities and counties, or public rapid transit districts, agencies, or authorities; or

(2) Making contributions to any public rapid transit district, agency, or authority exercising jurisdiction within the city or city and county for use in planning, acquiring, constructing,
 operating, or maintaining a rapid transit system. 

(b) A county may expend such money in making contributions to any city or public rapid transit district, agency, or authority within the county for use in planning, acquiring, constructing, operating, or maintaining a rapid transit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1852.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.2.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11005, the Controller shall not allocate any revenue pursuant to paragraph (1) of that subdivision to any city which receives revenue pursuant to Section 97.3 or pursuant to Section 56842.2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1210, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.3.

(a) In the case of a city that incorporated on or after January 1, 1987, and before August 5, 2004, the Controller shall determine that the population of the city for its first 10 full fiscal years, and any portion of the first year in which the incorporation is effective if less than a full fiscal year, is the
 greater of either:

(1) The number of registered voters in the city multiplied by three. The number of registered voters shall be calculated as of the effective date of the incorporation of the city.

(2) The actual population, as defined in subdivision (d).

(b) In the case of a city that incorporated on or after January 1, 1987, and before August 5, 2004, and for which the application for incorporation was filed with the executive officer of the local agency formation commission pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 56828 of the Government Code on or after January 1, 1991, the Controller shall determine that the population of the city for its first seven full fiscal years, and any portion of the first year in which the incorporation is effective if less than a full fiscal year, is the greater of either:

(1) The number of registered voters in the city multiplied by three. The number of registered voters shall be calculated as of the effective date of the incorporation of the city.

(2) The actual population, as defined in subdivision (d).

(c) In the case of a city that was incorporated from unincorporated territory after August 5, 2004, the Controller shall determine the population of the city as follows:

(1) For its first 12 months, 150 percent of the city’s actual population.

(2) For its 13th through 24th months, 140 percent of the city’s actual population.

(3) For its 25th through 36th months, 130 percent of the city’s actual
 population.

(4) For its 37th through 48th months, 120 percent of the city’s actual population.

(5) For its 49th through 60th months, 110 percent of the city’s actual population.

(6) After its 60th month, the city’s actual population.

(d) For purposes of this section, “actual population” means the population determined by the last federal decennial or special census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance or subsequent estimate prepared pursuant to Section 2107.2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(e) In the case of unincorporated territory being annexed to a city, during the 10-year, 7-year, or 5-year period following incorporation, as
 the case may be, subsequent to the last federal census, or a subsequent census validated by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance, the unit shall determine the population of the annexed territory by the use of any federal decennial or special census or any estimate prepared pursuant to Section 2107.2 of the Streets and Highways Code. The population of the annexed territory as determined by the Demographic Research Unit shall be added to the city’s population as previously determined by the Controller pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b), or subdivision (c), as applicable.

(f) After the 10-year, 7-year, or 5-year period following incorporation, as the case may be, the Controller shall determine the population of the city as the city’s actual population, as defined in subdivision (d).

(g) The amendments
 made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall not apply with respect to either of the following:

(1) Any city that has adopted an ordinance or resolution, approved a ballot measure, or is subject to a consent decree or court order, that annually limits the number of housing units that may be constructed within the city.

(2) Any city that has not prepared and adopted a housing element in compliance with Section 65585 of the Government Code.

(h) This section shall become operative July 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 23.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.4.

Notwithstanding Section 11005, for the 1993–94 fiscal year only, after payment of refunds therefrom and after making the deductions authorized by Section 11003 and reserving the amount determined necessary by the Pooled Money Investment Board to meet the transfers ordered or proposed to be ordered pursuant to Section 16310 of the Government Code, the Controller shall, in addition to making any allocations required by Section 11005, allocate, in accordance with the procedures applicable to those moneys allocated pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section
 11005, the amount of one hundred thirty million dollars ($130,000,000) as follows:

(a) Ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) to cities in proportion to the total property tax revenue allocation reduction for each city as a result of Sections 97.02 and 97.035, as determined by the Director of Finance.

(b) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) to counties and cities and counties in proportion to the total property tax revenue allocation reduction for each county or city and county as a result of Sections 97.02 and 97.035, as determined by the Director of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 68, Sec. 17.   Effective June 30, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.5.

The payments provided under Section 11005 shall not be made to any incorporated city which has not held an election of municipal officers within a period of 10 years preceding the date of such payment. Payments heretofore accumulated on behalf of any such city shall be apportioned to all other cities in the manner provided by Section 11005.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 854.)
-------------------------------------------

11005.6.

Any city, county, or city and county may apply to the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance to estimate its population. The department may make the estimate if in the opinion of the department there is available adequate information upon which to base the estimate. Not less than 25 days nor more than 30 days after the completion of the estimate, the Department of Finance shall file a certified copy thereof with the
 Controller if the estimate is greater than the current certified population. Such a certification may be made once each fiscal year.

All payments under Section 11005 for any allocation subsequent to the filing of the estimate shall be based upon the population so estimated until a subsequent certification is made by the Department of Finance or a subsequent federal decennial census is made.
